District of Columbia statutes.
24-406

Hearing after arrest; confinement in non-District institution.

(a)

When a prisoner has been retaken upon a warrant issued by the United States Parole Commission (“Commission”), he shall be given an opportunity to appear before the Commission, a member thereof, or an examiner designated by the Commission. At such hearing he may be represented by counsel. The Commission may then, or at any time in its discretion, revoke the parole or modify the terms and conditions thereof. If the order of parole shall be revoked, the prisoner, unless subsequently reparoled, shall serve the remainder of the sentence originally imposed less any commutation for good conduct which may be earned by him after his return to custody. For the purpose of computing commutation for good conduct, the remainder of the sentence originally imposed shall be considered as a new sentence.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

(1)

Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a parolee shall receive credit toward completion of the sentence for all time served on parole.

(2)

If a parolee is convicted of a crime committed during a period of parole, the Commission:

(A)

Shall order that the parolee not receive credit for that period of parole if the crime is punishable by a term of imprisonment of more than one year; or

(B)

Shall order that the parolee not receive credit for that period of parole if the crime is punishable by a term of imprisonment of one year or less unless the Commission determines that such forfeiture of credit is not necessary to protect the public welfare.

(3)

If, during the period of parole, a parolee intentionally refuses or fails to respond to any reasonable request, order, summons, or warrant of the Commission or any member or agent of the Commission, the Commission may order that the parolee not receive credit for the period of time that the Commission determines that the parolee failed or refused to respond to such a request, order, summons, or warrant.

(d)

The provisions of subsection (c) of this section shall apply only to any period of parole that is being served on or after the May 20, 2009, and shall not apply to any period of parole that was revoked prior to the May 20, 2009.

History

July 15, 1932, 47 Stat. 698, ch. 492, § 6
June 6, 1940, 54 Stat. 242, ch. 254, § 5
July 17, 1947, 61 Stat. 379, ch. 263, § 5
May 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-389, § 3(b), 56 DCR 1196

Cross References

Notice to chief of police of prisoner release, see § 5-113.05.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-113.05 and § 24-221.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-206.
1973 Ed., § 24-206.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-389 rewrote the section, which had read as follows:
“(a) When a prisoner has been retaken upon a warrant issued by the Board of Parole, he shall be given an opportunity to appear before the Board, a member thereof, or an examiner designated by the Board. At such hearing he may be represented by counsel. The Board may then, or at any time in its discretion, terminate the parole or modify the terms and conditions thereof. If the order of parole shall be revoked, the prisoner, unless subsequently reparoled, shall serve the remainder of the sentence originally imposed less any commutation for good conduct which may be earned by him after his return to custody. For the purpose of computing commutation for good conduct, the remainder of the sentence originally imposed shall be considered as a new sentence. The time a prisoner was on parole shall not be taken into account to diminish the time for which he was sentenced.
“(b) In the event a prisoner is confined in, or as a parolee is returned to a penal or correctional institution other than a penal or correctional institution of the District of Columbia, the Board of Parole created by § 723a of Title 18, United States Code, shall have and exercise the same power and authority as the Board of Parole of the District of Columbia had the prisoner been confined in or returned to a penal or correctional institution of the District of Columbia.”

References in Text

Section 723a of Title 18 of the United States Code, referred to in subsection (b) of this section, was repealed by the Act of June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 862, ch. 645, § 21.